Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 53 The 2010 Automobile Airbag Fraud Prevention Act

31-53-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Automobile Airbag Fraud Prevention Act of 2010.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 319, § 1.

31-53-2.
Purpose.

Airbag system fraud is a public safety concern for consumers and the automobile insurance system. Efforts to combat this problem, one that could place innocent consumers at-risk of serious bodily injuries, have been piecemeal. This chapter is intended to address the issue in a coordinated way. It is through this collective effort that consumers will be protected and the integrity of the restraint system assured.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 319, § 1.

31-53-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Airbag” means a motor vehicle inflatable occupant restraint system device that is part of a supplemental restraint system.

“Counterfeit supplemental restraint system component” means a replacement supplemental restraint system component, including, but not limited to, an airbag that displays a mark identical or substantially similar to the genuine mark of a motor vehicle manufacturer or a supplier of parts to the manufacturer of a motor vehicle without authorization from that manufacturer or supplier, respectively.

“Light manipulating system” means anything that would mask or cause the inaccurate indication of the airbag system status, condition, or operability.

“Nonfunctional airbag” means a replacement airbag that meets any of the following criteria:

The airbag was previously deployed or damaged;

The airbag has an electric fault that is detected by the vehicle’s airbag diagnostic systems when the installation procedure is completed and the vehicle is returned to the customer who requested the work to be performed or when ownership is intended to be transferred;

The airbag includes a part or object, including, but not limited to, a supplemental restraint system component installed in a motor vehicle to mislead the owner or operator of the motor vehicle into believing that a functional airbag has been installed; or

The airbag is subject to the prohibitions of 49 U.S.C. § 30120(j).

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, partnership, unincorporated association, or other entity.

“Salvaged airbag” means an original equipment manufacturer (“OEM”) non-deployed airbag that has been removed from a motor vehicle for use in another vehicle.

“Supplemental restraint system,” commonly referred to as an “SRS,” means a passive inflatable motor vehicle occupant crash protection system designed for use in conjunction with active restraint systems, as defined in 49 C.F.R. § 571.208. A supplemental restraint system includes one or more airbags and all components required to ensure that an airbag works as designed by the vehicle manufacturer, including both of the following:

The airbag operates as designed in the event of a crash; and

The airbag is designed in accordance with federal motor vehicle safety standards for the specific make, model, and year of the vehicle in which it is or will be installed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 60, § 1.

31-53-4.
Installation or reinstallation of any false airbag — Deceptive trade practices — Criminal liability.

It is a deceptive trade practice, in violation of chapter 13.1 of title 6, “Deceptive Trade Practices,” whenever:

A person installs or reinstalls, as part of a vehicle inflatable occupant restraint system, any object in lieu of an airbag, including a nonfunctional airbag, counterfeit supplemental restraint system component, or any light manipulating system;

A person imports, manufactures, sells, or offers for sale any device with the intent that the device will replace an airbag in any motor vehicle if the person knows, or reasonably should know, that the device supplemental restraint system component or otherwise does not meet federal safety requirements;

A person sells, or offers for sale, any device that, when installed in any motor vehicle, gives the impression that a viable airbag is installed in that vehicle, including any light manipulating system; or

Any person intentionally misrepresents the presence of an airbag when one does not exist.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter shall constitute an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under chapter 13.1 of title 6, entitled “Deceptive Trade Practices,” and the penalties and remedies provided in that chapter shall apply against any individual, corporation, or partnership violating any provision of this chapter.

Any person who violates this section is also guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) per violation, or imprisonment for a period of not more than two (2) years per violation, or both.

A person whose violation of subsection (a) of this section results in serious bodily injury or death shall be imprisoned for a period of not more than ten (10) years or fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or both, per violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 60, § 1.

31-53-5.
Airbag antitheft.

Purchase, sale, or installation of new or salvaged airbag — records.

Any person engaged in the business of purchasing, selling, or installing salvaged airbags shall maintain a manual and/or electronic record of the purchase, sale, or installation, which shall include the identification number of the airbag; the vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle from which the salvaged airbag was removed; the name, address, and driver’s license number or other means of identification of the person from whom the salvaged airbag was purchased; and, in the event that the salvaged airbag is installed, the vehicle identification number of the vehicle into which the airbag is installed. No new or salvaged airbag shall be sold or installed which is or has been subject to a specific manufacturer’s or appropriate authority’s notice of recall.

In the case of a new replacement airbag, any person engaged in installing any airbag shall maintain the name and tax identification number of the supplier of the airbag and record the vehicle identification number of the vehicle into which the airbag is installed, as well as the identification number of the airbag being installed. Additionally, the airbag identification of the previously deployed airbag being replaced shall be recorded. Upon request of any law enforcement officer of this state or other authorized representative of the agency charged with administration of this section, the installer shall produce such records and permit said agent or police officer to examine them.

Any person who sells a salvaged airbag or who installs a salvaged airbag must disclose to the purchaser and vehicle owner that the airbag is salvaged.

The person who installs a new or salvaged airbag shall submit an affidavit to the vehicle owner or their representative stating that the replacement airbag had been properly installed and received from the owner or their representatives written consent for its installation.

All records must be maintained for not less than five (5) years following the transaction, and may be inspected during normal business hours by any law enforcement officer of this state or other authorized representative of the agency charged with administration of this chapter.

Upon request, information within a portion of such record pertaining to a specific transaction must be provided to the insurer and the vehicle owner.

Persons engaged in the business of selling salvaged airbags shall comply with regulations developed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

State rules regarding the sale of salvaged airbags shall include, but not be limited to, the following standards:

Identification of the supplier of the unit;

Identification of the recipient vehicle, including VIN, year, make, and model;

Identification of the airbag module cover color (and color code if available);

Identification of the donor vehicle, including VIN, year, make, and model;

Supplier’s internal stock number or locator number;

Indication of source of interchange information (i.e. interchange manual/part number, OEM information, etc.);

A supplier certificate indicating that all the requirements of the inspection protocol have been successfully achieved and identifying the person who completed the inspection; and

A document containing the vehicle description including the year, make, and model for which the airbag system component is required when being sold to the end-user.

Salvaged airbags conforming to such standards shall be accompanied by a certificate of conformance that shall be retained by the installer.

Prohibition — penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly possess, sell, or install a stolen airbag; an airbag from which the manufacturer’s part number labeling and/or VIN has been removed, altered, or defaced; or an airbag taken from a stolen motor vehicle. Any person who violates this subdivision commits a felony.

Any person who fails to maintain complete and accurate records, to prepare complete and accurate documents, to provide information from such record upon request, or to properly disclose that an airbag is salvaged, as required by this chapter, commits a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 319, § 1.

31-53-6.
Accidents — Police authorities report.

Any automobile vehicle accident report that is filed by the appropriate law enforcement agency shall clearly contain a notation as to whether the automobile’s airbag or inflatable restraint system had been deployed in the accident.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 319, § 1.

31-53-7.
Sale or trade of motor vehicle with an inoperable airbag.

Any person selling or trading a motor vehicle who has actual knowledge that the motor vehicle has a nonfunctional airbag or counterfeit supplemental restraint system component installed or that an airbag is otherwise inoperable shall notify the buyer or the person acquiring the trade, in writing, of that defect.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section commits both a deceptive trade practice and a felony, and shall be subject to the penalties set forth in chapter 13.1 of title 6 for the deceptive trade practice, and also subject to the penalties set forth in §

31-53-4(c)

and/or (d), as appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 60, § 1.

31-53-8.
Rules and regulations.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 319, § 1.

31-53-9.
Severability.

If any section, paragraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or any part of this chapter is declared invalid, the remaining sections, paragraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or parts thereof shall in no manner be affected and shall remain in full force and effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 319, § 1.